Washington statutes.
RCW 7.68.062

Application for compensation—Treating provider shall provide assistance.

(1)(a) Where a victim is eligible for compensation under this chapter he or she shall file with the department his or her application for such, together with the certificate of the treating provider who attended him or her. An application for compensation form developed by the department shall include a notice specifying the victim's right to receive health services from a treating provider utilizing his or her private or public insurance or if no insurance, of the victim's choice under RCW 7.68.095.

(b) The treating provider who attended the injured victim shall inform the injured victim of his or her rights under this chapter and lend all necessary assistance in making this application for compensation and such proof of other matters as required by the rules of the department without charge to the victim.

(2) If the application required by this section is filed on behalf of the victim by the treating provider who attended the victim, the treating provider may transmit the application to the department electronically.

[ 2017 c 235 s 4; 2011 c 346 s 302.]

NOTES:

Intent—Retroactive application—Effective date—2011 c 346: See notes following RCW 7.68.020.